oo/vimspell/eo.aff
SFX T Y 330
SFX T a i a
SFX T 0 s a
SFX T a is a
SFX T a os a
SFX T a us a
SFX T a u a
SFX T 0 nta a
SFX T 0 ntaj a
SFX T 0 ntajn a
SFX T 0 ntan a
SFX T 0 nte a
SFX T 0 nt’ a
SFX T 0 nt' a
SFX T 0 nto a
SFX T 0 ntoj a
SFX T 0 ntojn a
SFX T 0 nton a
SFX T 0 ta a
SFX T 0 taj a
SFX T 0 tajn a
SFX T 0 tan a
SFX T 0 te a
SFX T 0 t’ a
SFX T 0 t' a
SFX T 0 to a
SFX T 0 toj a
SFX T 0 tojn a
SFX T 0 ton a
SFX T 0 do a
SFX T 0 don a
SFX T i ada i
SFX T i adaj i
SFX T i adajn i
SFX T i adan i
SFX T i ade i
SFX T i ad’ i
SFX T i ad' i
SFX T i ado i
SFX T i adoj i
SFX T i adojn i
SFX T i adon i
SFX T i adi i
SFX T i adas i
SFX T i adis i
SFX T i ados i
SFX T i adus i
SFX T i adu i
SFX T i as i
SFX T 0 s i
SFX T i os i
SFX T i us i
SFX T i u i
SFX T 0 nta i
SFX T 0 ntaj i
SFX T 0 ntajn i
SFX T 0 ntan i
SFX T 0 nte i
SFX T 0 nt’ i
SFX T 0 nt' i
SFX T 0 nto i
SFX T 0 ntoj i
SFX T 0 ntojn i
SFX T 0 nton i
SFX T i anta i
SFX T i antaj i
SFX T i antajn i
SFX T i antan i
SFX T i ante i
SFX T i ant’ i
SFX T i ant' i
SFX T i anto i
SFX T i antoj i
SFX T i antojn i
SFX T i anton i
SFX T i onta i
SFX T i ontaj i
SFX T i ontajn i
SFX T i ontan i
SFX T i onte i
SFX T i ont’ i
SFX T i ont' i
SFX T i onto i
SFX T i ontoj i
SFX T i ontojn i
SFX T i onton i
SFX T 0 ntina i
SFX T 0 ntinaj i
SFX T 0 ntinajn i
SFX T 0 ntinan i
SFX T 0 ntin’ i
SFX T 0 ntin' i
SFX T 0 ntino i
SFX T 0 ntinoj i
SFX T 0 ntinojn i
SFX T 0 ntinon i
SFX T i antina i
SFX T i antinaj i
SFX T i antinajn i
SFX T i antinan i
SFX T i antin’ i
SFX T i antin' i
SFX T i antino i
SFX T i antinoj i
SFX T i antinojn i
SFX T i antinon i
SFX T i ontina i
SFX T i ontinaj i
SFX T i ontinajn i
SFX T i ontinan i
SFX T i ontin’ i
SFX T i ontin' i
SFX T i ontino i
SFX T i ontinoj i
SFX T i ontinojn i
SFX T i ontinon i
SFX T u ada u
SFX T u adaj u
SFX T u adajn u
SFX T u adan u
SFX T u ade u
SFX T u ad’ u
SFX T u ad' u
SFX T u ado u
SFX T u adoj u
SFX T u adojn u
SFX T u adon u
SFX T u adi u
SFX T u adas u
SFX T u adis u
SFX T u ados u
SFX T u adus u
SFX T u adu u
SFX T u as u
SFX T u is u
SFX T u os u
SFX T 0 s u
SFX T u i u
SFX T u inta u
SFX T u intaj u
SFX T u intajn u
SFX T u intan u
SFX T u inte u
SFX T u int’ u
SFX T u int' u
SFX T u into u
SFX T u intoj u
SFX T u intojn u
SFX T u inton u
SFX T u anta u
SFX T u antaj u
SFX T u antajn u
SFX T u antan u
SFX T u ante u
SFX T u ant’ u
SFX T u ant' u
SFX T u anto u
SFX T u antoj u
SFX T u antojn u
SFX T u anton u
SFX T u onta u
SFX T u ontaj u
SFX T u ontajn u
SFX T u ontan u
SFX T u onte u
SFX T u ont’ u
SFX T u ont' u
SFX T u onto u
SFX T u ontoj u
SFX T u ontojn u
SFX T u onton u
SFX T u intina u
SFX T u intinaj u
SFX T u intinajn u
SFX T u intinan u
SFX T u intin’ u
SFX T u intin' u
SFX T u intino u
SFX T u intinoj u
SFX T u intinojn u
SFX T u intinon u
SFX T u antina u
SFX T u antinaj u
SFX T u antinajn u
SFX T u antinan u
SFX T u antin’ u
SFX T u antin' u
SFX T u antino u
SFX T u antinoj u
SFX T u antinojn u
SFX T u antinon u
SFX T u ontina u
SFX T u ontinaj u
SFX T u ontinajn u
SFX T u ontinan u
SFX T u ontin’ u
SFX T u ontin' u
SFX T u ontino u
SFX T u ontinoj u
SFX T u ontinojn u
SFX T u ontinon u
SFX T i o i
SFX T i ’ i
SFX T i ' i
SFX T i on i
SFX T u o u
SFX T u ’ u
SFX T u ' u
SFX T u on u
SFX T 0 ta i
SFX T 0 taj i
SFX T 0 tajn i
SFX T 0 tan i
SFX T 0 te i
SFX T 0 t’ i
SFX T 0 t' i
SFX T 0 to i
SFX T 0 toj i
SFX T 0 tojn i
SFX T 0 ton i
SFX T i ata i
SFX T i ataj i
SFX T i atajn i
SFX T i atan i
SFX T i ate i
SFX T i at’ i
SFX T i at' i
SFX T i ato i
SFX T i atoj i
SFX T i atojn i
SFX T i aton i
SFX T i ota i
SFX T i otaj i
SFX T i otajn i
SFX T i otan i
SFX T i ote i
SFX T i ot’ i
SFX T i ot' i
SFX T i oto i
SFX T i otoj i
SFX T i otojn i
SFX T i oton i
SFX T i eblas i
SFX T i eblis i
SFX T i eblos i
SFX T i eblus i
SFX T i ebla i
SFX T i eblaj i
SFX T i eblajn i
SFX T i eblan i
SFX T i eble i
SFX T i ebl’ i
SFX T i ebl' i
SFX T i eblo i
SFX T i eblon i
SFX T i endas i
SFX T i endis i
SFX T i endos i
SFX T i endus i
SFX T i enda i
SFX T i endaj i
SFX T i endajn i
SFX T i endan i
SFX T i ende i
SFX T i end’ i
SFX T i end' i
SFX T i endo i
SFX T i endoj i
SFX T i endojn i
SFX T i endon i
SFX T u ita u
SFX T u itaj u
SFX T u itajn u
SFX T u itan u
SFX T u ite u
SFX T u it’ u
SFX T u it' u
SFX T u ito u
SFX T u itoj u
SFX T u itojn u
SFX T u iton u
SFX T u ata u
SFX T u ataj u
SFX T u atajn u
SFX T u atan u
SFX T u ate u
SFX T u at’ u
SFX T u at' u
SFX T u ato u
SFX T u atoj u
SFX T u atojn u
SFX T u aton u
SFX T u ota u
SFX T u otaj u
SFX T u otajn u
SFX T u otan u
SFX T u ote u
SFX T u ot’ u
SFX T u ot' u
SFX T u oto u
SFX T u otoj u
SFX T u otojn u
SFX T u oton u
SFX T u eblas u
SFX T u eblis u
SFX T u eblos u
SFX T u eblus u
SFX T u ebla u
SFX T u eblaj u
SFX T u eblajn u
SFX T u eblan u
SFX T u eble u
SFX T u ebl’ u
SFX T u ebl' u
SFX T u eblo u
SFX T u eblon u
SFX T u endas u
SFX T u endis u
SFX T u endos u
SFX T u endus u
SFX T u enda u
SFX T u endaj u
SFX T u endajn u
SFX T u endan u
SFX T u ende u
SFX T u end’ u
SFX T u end' u
SFX T u endo u
SFX T u endoj u
SFX T u endojn u
SFX T u endon u
SFX U Y 66
SFX U a ula a
SFX U a ulaj a
SFX U a ulajn a
SFX U a ulan a
SFX U a ule a
SFX U a ul’ a
SFX U a ul' a
SFX U a ulo a
SFX U a uloj a
SFX U a ulojn a
SFX U a ulon a
SFX U a ulina a
SFX U a ulinaj a
SFX U a ulinajn a
SFX U a ulinan a
SFX U a uline a
SFX U a ulin’ a
SFX U a ulin' a
SFX U a ulino a
SFX U a ulinoj a
SFX U a ulinojn a
SFX U a ulinon a
SFX U o ula o
SFX U o ulaj o
SFX U o ulajn o
SFX U o ulan o
SFX U o ule o
SFX U o ul’ o
SFX U o ul' o
SFX U o ulo o
SFX U o uloj o
SFX U o ulojn o
SFX U o ulon o
SFX U o ulina o
SFX U o ulinaj o
SFX U o ulinajn o
SFX U o ulinan o
SFX U o uline o
SFX U o ulin’ o
SFX U o ulin' o
SFX U o ulino o
SFX U o ulinoj o
SFX U o ulinojn o
SFX U o ulinon o
SFX U i ula i
SFX U i ulaj i
SFX U i ulajn i
SFX U i ulan i
SFX U i ule i
SFX U i ul’ i
SFX U i ul' i
SFX U i ulo i
SFX U i uloj i
SFX U i ulojn i
SFX U i ulon i
SFX U i ulina i
SFX U i ulinaj i
SFX U i ulinajn i
SFX U i ulinan i
SFX U i uline i
SFX U i ulin’ i
SFX U i ulin' i
SFX U i ulino i
SFX U i ulinoj i
SFX U i ulinojn i
SFX U i ulinon i
