oo/vimspell/eo.dic
abstrakti/ACTBOY
aĉega/ACUVOY
admiri/ADOTB
adresi/KOUT
afekti/ABOTUY
agregi/TY
agresi/ABOTU
ajna/AOSUXYZ
aktiva/CELMUY
aktualigi/MRTBX
albanlingva/CEUWY
albordigi/AT
alihejma/AU
alikolorigi/AOTX
alimonda/AUY
alklimatigi/AOTX
almozi/AOUVB
alparoli/AOT
alŝuti/AQRTY
altpostena/AU
amasbuĉi/ATB
ambicii/ABOUT
amnestii/AOT
anarkio/ASOUZ
anasiri/AOT
anglomania/AOU
antaŭdestini/OTZ
antaŭi/ACMOQUXTY
antaŭparoli/AOT
antipodo/AOU
apendicito/AOU
apreci/AMOT?
arablingva/AWU
arbarumi/AOT
aroganta/ACUOY
artiki/AOTU
artrito/AOU
aspiri/AOT
atendita/EFU
aŭdigi/AOTz
aŭdita/EFU
avantaĝa/AMOU
averti/BLOTy
avidi/ACOUT
bandaĝi/SOT
bankroti/AGOUVB
basa/AOVU
batdifekti/AOT
beki/AOT
bela/AeGMOQCUVY
benefici/AOUV
bitigi/T
blankganta/AU
blankkitela/AU
blasfemi/BOUVS
blindeta/AOU
blufi/AOUVB
boedzigi/AOTX
bonanima/AMU
bonaŭguri/AMOTV
bonfida/AOU
bonlingvismo/AOU
bonŝanca/ABMOU
brava/AMOUY
breĉeti/AOT
bronzi/AOTY
brulvundi/AOT
brunhaŭta/AU
burleska/AUO
ĉampanizi/AOT
ĉeĥlingva/ACUWY
ĉemeti/AOT
ĉemiza/AOUY
ĉerpi/AdLlQT_
ĉiama/AOUX
ĉikani/ABOTU
ĉiopova/AU
ĉirkaŭkradi/T
ĉirkaŭveturi/T
danci/AeGJOTBS
dankema/EMOU
decidema/EOU
dediĉi/AOT
dekati/T
dekjaraĝa/ANU
dekpieda/AU
dekroĉi/AOT
delikata/ACMUY
delikto/AOU
demonomania/AOU
dentizi/LT
deskvamigi/OTX
determinisma/EOU
devigi/AlOT
dezirata/CEOUY
diamanti/ASOT
dika/ACMGOQUY
dikmalalta/AU
dikventra/AU
dinamiti/AOT
disduigi/AOTX
disforkigi/AOTX
diskriminacii/BOT
dispozicii/AOT
diveni/STY
dormi/ABFGhLMOUV
dozi/AOT
dudekkelkjara/AU
dukotiledona/AU
duŝi/ALJOT
egocentra/AUZ
ekfumi/AOT
eklektika/ACOUZ
ekrani/T
ekscentra/ACUY
ekspliki/ABOT
eksterleĝa/AU
ekstrakti/AOT
eldoganigi/AOTX
eleganta/ACMUO
elfrostigi/AOTX
elĵeti/UTY
elkajigi/AOT
ellitigi/AOTX
elpoenti/T
elsaligi/AOTX
elstakigi/AOT
emaksa/AHUY
emfazi/BLOT
enbrakigi/AOTX
endemio/ACOUZ
endormigi/ALOTX
enfundigi/OTX
eningigi/AOTX
enkarnigi/AORTX
enkorpigi/AORTX
enlegigi/OTX
enmatrikuligi/T
enpersonigi/AOTX
enregistri/T
enspaci/AT
entrajnigi/AOTX
envii/ABDGMOUT
envulti/AOT
erarema/EOU
escepti/AOTUY
eskuzi/AOT?
esplorema/AU
eta/ACOQUG
etendi/AOQTYz
eteromania/AOU
etranga/AU
faksi/ALOTY
faluni/AJOT
fanatika/ACGU
fascini/AOT
fava/AOUY
federi/ACOTQSUYZ
ferdeki/AOT
fervora/AGQsU
fiaski/AGOUV
fidi/AMOTB
fiega/AOUY
fikshejma/AGQU
findecidi/AT
fini/AGOQUTYy
finklavi/T
finpagi/T
finteksi/T
flanki/OT
flati/ABOSUTY
flavbeka/AU
fleksebla/CEMOUY
fliki/SOLTY
fordandi/T
forĝu/AajlT
forkonfesi/T
fornomi/T
fortega/AMOU
fortigi/AMRsTX
francdevena/AU
frapfermi/T
frata/ACGKQUV
fremdlanda/AOUW
frenezi/AGOQUVY
froti/ALOQSTY
ftizo/AOU
fumizi/AOT
funkcio/KOSU
furori/AOUV
fuŝkuiri/ST
ganti/ST
gapi/AUVB
genia/ACOUYY
ĝeni/ACeOUTY
ĝentila/CEMUOY
ĝiba/AGOQUY
ĝisosta/AU
glaciumi/T
glori/ADMGOQTUY
glosolalio/AOU
GNU-a/AUY
goli/AHOUV
gracio/ACMOU
grandanima/ACMU
grandi/AOCGMQUVY
grefti/AjLOTY
greklingva/CEWUY
grizhara/AU
groteska/AUOY
gugli/AT
haketi/LTY
handikapi/AOTUY
ĥarismo/AOU
hebrelingva/AUW
hejmenporti/T
ĥimero/AOU
hipertrofii/AOT
hirta/ACGQUZ
histeria/AOU
ĥo-fobio/AOU
homevita/AU
homvora/AU
honori/ADMGOTY
hundkapa/AU
imiti/ABDSLOTY
impotenta/ACU
imputi/T?
indi/ACGOQMTY
indiferenta/ACeOUYZ
infanaĝa/AOU
informi/LOTBYy
inkluzivi/ABGT
instruita/CEU
insulti/ABOTY
interkrurigi/AOTX
intima/ACSUYZ
inventari/AOT
ĵaluzi/AOUVB
jeĵuri/AOT
jubilea/AUOV
junaĝa/AMOU
junigi/ARTX
kaduki/ACGQUVY
kalcini/T
kalumnii/AOUTB
kanalizi/AOT
kancera/AOU
kaprokrura/AU
karburi/TL
karno/AJOUY
kaŝita/CEUY
kaŝrigardi/AOT
katalunlingva/AUW
kaŭĉukizi/AOT
kelkjara/AU
klasi/aQTy
klera/CEhmOUY
kloni/AOT
klostrofobio/AOU
kodumi/AOUT
kojnumi/T
kolerika/AU
komisii/ASOUT
kompetenta/ACeMOUV
komplimenti/ABOT
komputfako/AOU
konato/CEFKUY
koncentri/AJMOQT
konekti/ALMOQTY
konfirmi/ALMORQT
konjugacii/AOT
konkurenci/AOUV
konsilu/AMOT
kontaĝi/ABOT
kontrolmarki/AOT
korfavori/AOT
korno/ACeNOQU
kosti/AOT
krakmaĉi/AT
kribri/LTY
krimi/AjCUV
kromnomi/AOT
krucosigni/AOT
kulpa/ACGjQsU
kultivi/LOT
kuntiri/AOQTY
kursivigi/MsT
kverelema/AOU
kvoti/GOT
lardumi/AOT
latinalfabeta/EU
lazi/AOT
liberala/AUZ
liberlasi/AOT
linuksa/AUY
literumi/ALOTy
loko/eGKOUWY
lui/AGOT
magneti/MT
malcentralizi/AORT
malfrizi/RT
malkorki/T
malplenkapa/AU
mamnutri/T
manpremi/AOT
marmorumi/AOT
marodi/ABOSTU
maŝinskribi/AOT
meĥanizi/AOT
memfida/AOU
mezaĝa/AU
mezuri/ALOQSTY
miliarda/AUO
misa/ACOUVY
misatribui/AOT
misinstali/AOT
missignalo/AOT
mitomanio/AOU
moderno/GOQUYZ
moduli/LMOT
moŝta/ACOU
moveti/AOT
muta/ACGQUV
neortodoksa/ACU
nigrumi/AOT
nimfeomanio/AOU
novrita/AMUW
nuanci/AOT
nuntempo/ACOUW
oficiala/CEGhMQUxY
okuli/AOST
orbuŝa/AU
orient-rita/AUW
orientumi/AOT
paniki/AOUV
papiliumi/T
paŭsi/ATY
peketi/AGOUV
pentru/RQT
perforta/EOU
pertrami/T
pesta/AOU
pilgrimi/AOUV
pisti/ALTz
plibonigi/AMOTBX
pliriĉigi/AMTX
plurĉela/AU
porciumi/T
portugallingva/AUW
pragmata/AOUYZ
pravigi/MRTX
preskribi/AOTY
pridiskuti/AOT
prilumi/AOT
priservi/T
profani/AMOQTUY
promesi/AhOT
proprieti/AOTUY
pruntepreni/AOT
publiko/OUY
punlaboro/AOU
rabati/AOETY
rabia/AOU
rampa/AUOY
ratifi/AOT
reformema/AU
regeneri/ALOQT
remaigi/ALOT
respondeci/AOUV
restitui/AOTY
revelacii/AOT
riĉa/ACeMGOQUVY
rigora/CEMOSUZ
rondfaldeti/T
rufa/AU
ruĝgorĝa/AOU
saboti/ATUY
salajri/AOUT_^
sameklezia/AUW
samprofesia/AUW
samseksama/AMU
ŝanĝiĝema/EOU
ŝategi/ADMOT
ŝatinda/AMU
sekretigi/ABDMOTvX
ŝemidlingva/EUW
senfila/AU
senhejma/AU
senkultura/AGQU
senranga/AGU
senvalora/AGQUY
servuti/AOCUV
sieĝi/AkOoT
sintruda/ABUY
ŝirtiri/AT
skorpio/AOU
skurĝi/AOT
sonizoli/T
sovaĝeta/ACOU
spezi/AOT[
ŝteli/flQT
stipendii/OUT
stopi/AOTX
stranga/ACOUVY
stultega/AMOUY
sturmi/AOTU
ŝuldigi/AMOTX
superi/ABCMUTXY
supozi/AGTO[
surprizviziti/AOT
ŝvabri/ALT
talento/AOU
tedi/ACOQUTY
teni/dBDLlMRTv[
teoria/ASOU
tiki/AOUV
tiregi/AOT
tradicirompo/AOSU
tradukprunti/AOT
transatendi/AOT
transpoŝigi/ORT
travagi/AOT
trostreĉi/AOT
trudiĝema/AaOU
tubizi/AOT
uniksa/AU
urbanizi/AOST
uza/ADOUY
vaga/AU
vanta/ABCGOUY
varbi/ATO
verdi/ACJGOQUVY
vernisi/AOT
virga/ACU
vivteni/AOT
voji/KOSU
vulgara/ACGUOY
vundeti/AOQT
